Oklahoma, session 2026, SB702.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-103.12,


is amended to read as follows:


Section 11-103.12. A. Sections 1 11-103.12 through 3 11-103.14


of this act title shall be known and may be cited as the “Health


Education Act”.


B. The purpose of this act the Health Education Act is to:


1. Ensure provide students receive instruction in with the


skills and knowledge in physical health, particularly at an early


age when habits are formed;


2. Support the health and well-being of children that have been


affected by traumatic experiences;


3. Improve academic outcomes for students; and


4. Improve the overall health outcomes of Oklahoma’s population


exercise, and nutrition they need to be healthy throughout their


lives, provide parents and legal guardians with informed consent,


and provide school districts in this state with health education


guidance.


C. As used in the Health Education Act:


1. “Benchmark” means the identification of what a student will


know and be able to demonstrate by the end of each grade level;


2. “Health education” means providing students with knowledge


and skills they need to be healthy throughout their lives by


including motivation for students to maintain and improve their

Req. No. 1284 Page 2


health by way of nutrition, physical exercise, and physical


activities;


3. “Informed consent” means voluntary written consent from a


person who received full, accurate, and sufficient information and


explanation about a student’s medical condition, medication, and


treatment to enable the person to make a knowledgeable decision


without being subjected to deceit or coercion;


4. “Nutrition” means the total processes involved in the taking


in and utilization of food substances by which growth, repair, and


maintenance of the body are accomplished; and


5. “Standard” means an objective general statement that


identifies what the student is expected to achieve.


D. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this act the Health Education Act.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-103.13,


is amended to read as follows:


Section 11-103.13. A. Health education shall be taught in the


public schools of this state. Health education shall include but is


not be limited to physical:


1. Physical health, mental health, social and emotional health


and intellectual health not to include sex education or gender


theory;


2. Physical exercise;


3. Physical activities; and

Req. No. 1284 Page 3


4. Nutrition.


B. By the 2022-2023 2025-2026 school year, the State Department


of Education shall:


1. Develop a micro-credential for teachers who are assigned the


responsibility of teaching health education; and standards and


benchmarks for:


a. physical health, not to include sex education or


gender theory,


b. physical exercise,


c. physical activities, and


d. nutrition; and


2. Develop professional development programs that are designed


to help teachers provide instruction in physical health education


and incorporate the curriculum into existing coursework and


instruction where appropriate, physical exercise, physical


activities, and nutrition. The professional development provided as


part of this act the Health Education Act shall not be construed to


be in addition to existing professional development requirements.


C. By the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year, school districts


shall provide instruction addressing all health education subject


matter standards, as adopted by the State Board of Education


pursuant to Section 11-103.6 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title. Health education may be integrated into one or more


existing subjects or provided as an addition to existing coursework.

Req. No. 1284 Page 4


D. Teachers assigned to teach health education as a stand-alone


course shall be certified in physical and health education. The


State Department of Education is authorized to issue a provisional


certificate, valid for not more than two (2) years, to individuals


assigned to teach a stand-alone health education course in order to


afford the individual the opportunity to obtain certification in


physical and health education.


E. The State Department of Education shall review, and the


State Board of Education shall approve, all digital and hard copies


of curricula, materials, supplementary materials, tests, surveys,


and questionnaires related to implementation of the Health Education


Act. For statewide consistency, transparency, and accountability,


all public school districts in this state shall use Board-approved


curricula, materials, supplementary materials, tests, surveys, and


questionnaires.


F. The State Textbook Committee shall include a review of


health and physical education instructional materials as part of its


textbook review and adoption cycle.


G. By July 1, 2027, and by each July 1 thereafter, school


district boards of education in this state shall electronically


submit a report to the State Department of Education describing the


implementation of the instruction and curriculum required by the


Health Education Act during the previous year.



Req. No. 1284 Page 5


H. The State Board of Education shall establish a process by


which individuals in this state who believe a school district has


committed a violation of the Health Education Act may submit a


written complaint to the Board. Upon a finding by the Board that a


school district has committed a violation of the Health Education


Act, the Board may report the school district as deficient on its


accreditation report for the following year.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 281, O.S.L.


2022 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 24-159), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 24-159. A. Each public school district shall maintain


a protocol for responding to students in mental health crisis with


the goal of preventing student suicide, self-harm, and harm to


others.


1. The protocol shall be developed, maintained, and implemented


in partnership with one or more local mental health treatment


providers certified by the Department of Mental Health and Substance


Abuse Services. At least one provider partner shall have:


a. the ability to serve all school-aged children


regardless of insurance status, and


b. the ability and certification to provide mental health


crisis services in the region where students attend


school.



Req. No. 1284 Page 6


2. Any organization certified by the state as a community


mental health center as defined in Section 3-302 of Title 43A of the


Oklahoma Statutes or a Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic


shall serve as a school partner if requested by a school district


located in its state-designated service area.


B. The protocol for responding to mental health crises shall,


at a minimum:


1. Provide a definition of mental health crisis involving


potential for harm to self or others;


2. Document how mental health crises may be identified by


school administrators, teachers, support employees, and school-based


mental health professionals;


3. Outline nonpunitive steps to safeguard student health and


safety in response to an immediate or potential mental health


crisis;


4. Identify local treatment providers and resources available


to support students and families in mental health crisis and ensure


appropriate referrals to treatment;


5. Outline a process for ensuring parent and caregiver


notification and involvement during an actual or potential mental


health crisis; and


6. Document how student privacy will be protected in compliance


with applicable state and federal laws.



Req. No. 1284 Page 7


C. If a student who is under eighteen (18) years of age is


identified as being in or at risk of a mental health crisis, the


school shall inform the parent or legal guardian of the student and


offer the treatment referral information contained in the protocol.


Parent or legal guardian consent shall be required for any


subsequent action taken by the school as part of the protocol except


in cases of immediate and life-threatening danger to self or others.


D. All protocols developed by school districts and partner


organizations shall comply with the Health Insurance Portability and


Accountability Act (HIPAA) of 1996 and Family Educational Rights and


Privacy Act of 1974 (FERPA) privacy requirements.


E. School administrators, teachers, support employees, and


school-based mental health providers shall be provided ready access


to and regular training on the protocol.


F. A working agreement shall be signed by the school district


board of education and each identified mental health provider


partner outlining all obligations of the parties under the


established protocol and a strategy for regularly reviewing its


effectiveness using anonymous, nonidentifiable data.


G. Not less than every two (2) years, the school district and


its mental health provider partners shall jointly review the


protocol and working agreements and consider any updates necessary


to better meet the needs of students. School districts and mental


health provider partners shall include in their review process

Req. No. 1284 Page 8


information gathered from the Oklahoma Prevention Needs Assessment


Survey or an alternative survey, as provided for in Section 24-158


of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


H. Each school district shall submit the latest protocol and


working agreements to the State Department of Education, which shall


share the protocols and agreements with the Department of Mental


Health and Substance Abuse Services. These agencies may require


revisions to ensure compliance with applicable laws, regulations,


and established evidence-based practices.


I. H. The Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse


Services and the State Department of Education shall provide


technical assistance to school districts and their provider partners


by:


1. Making available an optional template protocol which


satisfies the provisions of this section;


2. Making available an optional template working agreement


which can be adopted by schools and provider partners;


3. Providing school districts with lists of local public and


private treatment providers eligible to serve as partners in the


development and maintenance of a protocol;


4. Providing information on any available mental health crisis


phone line;


5. Making available information on evidence-based practices for


meeting the mental health needs of students; and

Req. No. 1284 Page 9


6. Providing ongoing assistance and consultation as requested


by a school district.


J. I. The Board of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services


and the State Board of Education may promulgate rules as necessary


to ensure compliance with this section.


K. J. Nothing in this section shall be construed to create,


establish, expand, reduce, contract, or eliminate any civil


liability on the part of any school or school employee.


SECTION 4. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Sections 11-103.9b and


24-158, as amended by Section 2, Chapter 281, O.S.L. 2022 (70 O.S.


Supp. 2024, Section 24-158), are hereby repealed.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1284 EB 1/19/2025 5:41:40 AM













Req. No. 1284 Page 10